Washington statutes.
RCW 7.80.160

Failure to exercise notice options—Failure to satisfy penalty.

(1) Any person who, after receiving a statement of the options provided in this chapter for responding to the notice of civil infraction and the procedures necessary to exercise these options, fails to exercise one of the options in a timely manner is guilty of a misdemeanor regardless of the disposition of the notice of civil infraction. A notice of civil infraction may be complied with by an appearance by counsel.

(2) A person who willfully fails to pay a monetary penalty or to perform community restitution as required by a court under this chapter may be found in contempt of court as provided in chapter 7.21 RCW.

[ 2006 c 270 s 6; 2002 c 175 s 2; 1989 c 373 s 12; 1987 c 456 s 24.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2002 c 175: See note following RCW 7.80.130.